New Jersey, session 221, S3665.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: a.     "State agency" means any of the principal departments in the Executive Branch of the State Government, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by such department, the Legislature of the State and any office, board, bureau or commission within or created by the Legislative Branch, and, to the extent consistent with law, any interstate agency to which New Jersey is a party and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality or agency.  A county or municipality shall not be deemed an agency or instrumentality of the State. b.    "State employee" means any person holding an office or employment in a State agency, including a member of the Legislature. 2.    Every State employee who has access to a State agency computer shall annually undergo cybersecurity training incorporating best practices as presented by the New Jersey Cybersecurity and Communications Integration Cell, established pursuant to Executive Order No. 178 (2015) in the New Jersey Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness.  The office may, in its discretion, make the training available as an online course.  The training shall include, but need not be limited to, updating passwords; detecting phishing scams; preventing ransomware, spyware infections, and identity theft; and preventing and responding to data breaches. The Director of the Office of Homeland Security and Preparedness shall adopt guidelines to implement the requirements of this section. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.